Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Article 5. Virginia Center for Housing Research.

§ 23.1-2633.
Virginia Center for Housing Research established.

The Virginia Center for Housing Research (the Housing Center) is established and shall be located at the University.

History.

1989, c. 700, § 23-135.7:14; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2634.
Functions, powers, and duties.

The Housing Center shall serve as an interdisciplinary study, research, and information resource on housing for the Commonwealth. The Housing Center shall (i) consult with the General Assembly; federal, state, and local agencies; nonprofit organizations; private industry; and other potential users of research; (ii) establish and administer agreements with other public institutions of higher education and private institutions of higher education to carry out research projects; (iii) disseminate new information and research results; (iv) facilitate the application and transfer of new technologies to housing; and (v) stimulate and perform research that deals with housing policy issues facing the General Assembly and aids the Commonwealth’s housing and housing finance agencies.

History.

1989, c. 700, § 23-135.7:15; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2635.
Control and supervision.

The Housing Center is a unit of the University under the supervision and control of the board.

History.

1989, c. 700, § 23-135.7:16; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2636.
Director.

The president of the University, with the approval of the board, shall appoint a director to serve as the principal administrative officer of the Housing Center. The director shall be under the supervision of the president of the University or his designee.

The director shall exercise all powers imposed upon him by law, carry out the specific duties imposed on him by the president of the University, and develop appropriate policies and procedures, with the advice of the Board of Housing and Community Development, for (i) identifying priority research problems; (ii) cooperating with the General Assembly; federal, state, and local agencies; nonprofit organizations; and private industry in formulating its research programs; (iii) selecting research projects to be funded; and (iv) disseminating information and transferring technology relating to housing and housing problems within the Commonwealth. The director shall employ such personnel and secure such services as may be required to carry out the purposes of this article, expend appropriated funds, and accept moneys from federal or private sources for cost-sharing on projects.

History.

1989, c. 700, §§ 23-135.7:17, 23-135.7:18; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2637.
Advisory board.

The Board of Housing and Community Development shall advise the director of the Housing Center and may advise the director on all matters set forth in §

23.1-2634

.

History.

1992, c. 754, § 23-135.7:20; 2016, c. 588.